Ohio, session 136, HB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 125.03 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 125.03. (A) As used in this section : 7
(1) "State agency" means any organized body, office, 8
agency, institution, or other entity established by the laws of 9
the state for the exercise of any function of state government. 10
(2) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, 11
municipal corporation, or any other body corporate and politic 12
that is responsible for government activities in a geographic 13
area smaller than that of the state. 14
(B) No state agency or political subdivision shall use 15
public funds to purchase a flag of the United States or of this 16

H. B. No. 223 Page 2
As Introduced
state that is not made in the United States. 17